Illinois, session 104th, HB4946.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-60 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-60)7    Sec. 15-60. Taxing district property. All property 8belonging to any county or municipality used exclusively for 9the maintenance of the poor is exempt, as is all property owned 10by a taxing district that is being held for future expansion or 11development, except if leased by the taxing district to 12lessees for use for other than public purposes. 13    Also exempt are:14        (a) all swamp or overflowed lands belonging to any 15    county;16        (b) all public buildings belonging to any county, 17    township, or municipality, with the ground on which the 18    buildings are erected;19        (c) all property owned by any municipality located 20    within its incorporated limits. Any such property leased 21    by a municipality shall remain exempt, and the leasehold 22    interest of the lessee shall be assessed under Section 23    9-195 of this Act, (i) for a lease entered into on or after   HB4946- 2 -LRB104 17368 HLH 30793 b1    January 1, 1994, unless the lease expressly provides that 2    this exemption shall not apply; (ii) for a lease entered 3    into on or after the effective date of Public Act 87-1280 4    and before January 1, 1994, unless the lease expressly 5    provides that this exemption shall not apply or unless 6    evidence other than the lease itself substantiates the 7    intent of the parties to the lease that this exemption 8    shall not apply; and (iii) for a lease entered into before 9    the effective date of Public Act 87-1280, if the terms of 10    the lease do not bind the lessee to pay the taxes on the 11    leased property or if, notwithstanding the terms of the 12    lease, the municipality has filed or hereafter files a 13    timely exemption petition or complaint with respect to 14    property consisting of or including the leased property 15    for an assessment year which includes part or all of the 16    first 12 months of the lease period. The foregoing clause 17    (iii) added by Public Act 87-1280 shall not operate to 18    exempt property for any assessment year as to which no 19    timely exemption petition or complaint has been filed by 20    the municipality or as to which an administrative or court 21    decision denying exemption has become final and 22    nonappealable. For each assessment year or portion thereof 23    that property is made exempt by operation of the foregoing 24    clause (iii), whether such year or portion is before or 25    after the effective date of Public Act 87-1280, the 26    leasehold interest of the lessee shall, if necessary, be   HB4946- 3 -LRB104 17368 HLH 30793 b1    considered omitted property for purposes of this Act;2        (c-5) Notwithstanding clause (i) of subsection (c), or 3    any other law to the contrary, for a municipality with a 4    population over 100,000, all property owned by the 5    municipality, or property interests or rights held by the 6    municipality, regardless of whether such property, 7    interests, or rights are, in whole or in part, within or 8    without its corporate limits, that is used for toll road 9    or toll bridge purposes and that is leased or licensed for 10    those purposes to another entity whose property or 11    property interests or rights are not exempt shall remain 12    exempt, and any leasehold interest in such property, 13    interest, or rights shall not be subject to taxation under 14    Section 9-195 of this Code;15        (d) all property owned by any municipality located 16    outside its incorporated limits but within the same county 17    when used as a tuberculosis sanitarium, farm colony in 18    connection with a house of correction, or nursery, garden, 19    or farm, or for the growing of shrubs, trees, flowers, 20    vegetables, and plants for use in beautifying, 21    maintaining, and operating playgrounds, parks, parkways, 22    public grounds, buildings, and institutions owned or 23    controlled by the municipality;24        (e) all property owned by a township and operated as 25    senior citizen housing under Sections 35-50 through 26    35-50.6 of the Township Code; and  HB4946- 4 -LRB104 17368 HLH 30793 b1        (f) all property owned by the Executive Board of the 2    Mutual Aid Box Alarm System (MABAS), a unit of 3    intergovernmental cooperation, that is used for the public 4    purpose of disaster preparedness and response for units of 5    local government and the State of Illinois pursuant to 6    Section 10 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution and 7    the Intergovernmental Cooperation Act; and . 8        (g) beginning in taxable year 2026, all property 9    leased, subleased, or rented, in whole or in part, to a 10    taxing district and used exclusively for a bona fide 11    taxing district purpose, with the exemption applying only 12    to the portion of the property used for bona fide taxing 13    district purposes. 14    All property owned by any municipality outside of its 15corporate limits is exempt if used exclusively for municipal 16or public purposes.17    An exemption under item (g) shall be granted only upon 18application to the Department of Revenue by the taxing 19district in the manner prescribed by the Department of 20Revenue. The application shall include: (1) proof that the 21taxing district is exempt from taxation under this Code; and 22(2) a copy of the lease, sublease, or rental agreement. An 23exemption granted under item (g) applies only for the duration 24of the lease, sublease, or rental term identified in the 25application and terminates at the end of that term unless a 26lease or rental extension is submitted in a subsequent   HB4946- 5 -LRB104 17368 HLH 30793 b1application filed in the manner prescribed by the Department 2of Revenue. 3    For purposes of this Section, "municipality" means a 4municipality, as defined in Section 1-1-2 of the Illinois 5Municipal Code.6(Source: P.A. 101-398, eff. 8-16-19.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.